Connecticut, session 2026, SB00223.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 203 of public act 23-204, as amended by section 124
of public act 24-81, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Health benefit plan" has the same meaning as provided in section
38a-1080 of the general statutes; [,] and
(2) "Partnership plan" has the same meaning as provided in section 3-
123aaa of the general statutes.
(b) For the fiscal [years] year ending [June 30, 2024, and June 30, 2025]
June 30, 2027, and each fiscal year thereafter, the Comptroller shall
establish a program to provide a subsidy, within available
appropriations, to each paraeducator who (1) opens a health savings
SB223 / File No. 695 1

SB223 File No. 695
account, pursuant to Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
or any subsequent corresponding internal revenue code of the United
States, as amended from time to time, or is eligible for Medicare and
enrolls in a high deductible health plan, and (2) is employed [by a local
or regional board of education] in a public school. Such subsidy shall be
in an amount up to a certain percentage, as specified by the Comptroller,
of the deductible for the health plan in which such paraeducator is
enrolled, minus the amount of any employer contributions to a health
savings account or health reimbursement account, and not exceeding an
amount specified by the Comptroller. No paraeducator may receive
more than one subsidy pursuant to this section. The Comptroller may
work with the local or regional board of education that employs such
paraeducator to distribute such subsidy.
(c) For the fiscal year ending [June 30, 2025] June 30, 2027, and each
fiscal year thereafter, the Comptroller shall establish a program to
provide a subsidy, from any funds appropriated for such purpose, to
each local or regional board of education that provides coverage to
paraeducators and their dependents under a health benefit plan or a
partnership plan for such fiscal year or any portion thereof. Such
subsidy shall be (1) in an amount not more than ten per cent of the
aggregate premium cost, inclusive of the employee and employer
shares, paid by such board of education for coverage under such health
benefit plan or partnership plan, divided by the number of
paraeducators employed by such board of education and enrolled in
health coverage, and (2) used to offset the employee's share of such
premium that is deducted from the payroll check of each paraeducator
employed by such board of education during any pay period during
such fiscal year. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a
local or regional board of education that provides coverage under a high
deductible health plan, as that term is used in subsection (f) of section
38a-520 of the general statutes. Pursuant to the provisions of subsection
(b) of section 10-66dd of the general statutes, the provisions of this
section shall apply to charter schools.
[(d) The Comptroller and the Commissioner of Education shall enter
SB223 / File No. 695 2

SB223 File No. 695
into a memorandum of understanding, in accordance with the
provisions of section 4-97b of the general statutes, to allow the
Comptroller to utilize the sum of $5,000,000 that is appropriated to the
Department of Education for assistance to paraeducators pursuant to
section 1 of public act 23-204 to implement the provisions of this
section.]
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 PA 23-204, Sec. 203
ED Joint Favorable C/R APP
APP Joint Favorable
SB223 / File No. 695 3

SB223 File No. 695
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Comptroller GF - Cost 10 million 10 million
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill extends the paraeducator health care subsidy program
within the Office of the State Comptroller (OSC) from FY 27 onwards
and expands eligibility to paraeducators employed in charter schools,
resulting in an annual cost of $10 million.1
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
Funding for this program ranged between $5 to $10 million beginning in FY 24. The
FY 26 and 27 Budget appropriated $10 million to this program within OSC. Subsidies
were dispersed subject to fund availability.
SB223 / File No. 695 4

SB223 File No. 695
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 223
AN ACT CONCERNING THE PARAEDUCATOR HEALTH CARE
SUBSIDY PROGRAM.